Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1380
Costs; by whom paid.

All activities in connection with the implementation of sections 54-1367 to 54-1384 shall be available to livestock owners without expense as long as funds for such activities have been appropriated and are available, except for the cost of handling livestock and the cost of brucellosis vaccine. When funds are not available, the owner shall nevertheless continue the program at his or her own expense.

Laws 1983, LB 573, § 14.